Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.020

Rules and regulations—Enforcement of chapter—Interference prohibited.

The director, but not his or her duly authorized representative, may adopt such rules and regulations as are necessary to carry out the purpose of this chapter. It shall be the duty of the director to enforce and carry out the provisions of this chapter, rules and regulations adopted hereunder. No person shall interfere with the director when he or she is performing or carrying out duties imposed on him or her by this chapter, rules and regulations adopted hereunder.

[ 2011 c 336 s 569; 1959 c 139 s 2.]